Delaware, session 153, HB222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 2244, Title 3 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 2244. Certification; applications; suspension, modification; revocation. (a) The Commission may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing, suspend, revoke, or modify any certificate granted under this chapter or fine any person against whom a complaint has been brought, or both, if the Commission finds the person certified has been found guilty of any violation of this chapter or Commission regulations. (b) The Commission may impose a fine of not less than $25 $125 nor more than $1,000 $5,000 for each violation. Each day of continued violation may be considered as a separate violation up to a limit of $10,000. (c) Any fines collected by the Department of Agriculture under this chapter shall be appropriated to the Department for use in assisting persons in achieving compliance or to demonstrate the application of research that may be of substantial benefit to many individuals seeking compliance with this chapter. (d) All decisions of the Commission relating to suspension, modification or revocation of a certificate shall be final and conclusive unless the person whose certificate was suspended, modified or revoked appeals according to the provisions of Â§ 2263 of this title.